Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1820
Inspector General; report conduct; when.

If the Inspector General has reason to believe that any public officer or employee has acted in a manner that warrants criminal or disciplinary action or proceedings, the Inspector General shall report the matter to the department, the juvenile services division, the commission, or other appropriate authorities.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 43.